Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PURPOSE.new text end new text begin Since the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency was created in 1967, the citizens board served as a check on the actions of the agency staff and commissioner. The citizens board listened to the concerns of Minnesotans, giving voice to rural, urban, and suburban residents concerned about decisions made by agency staff in St. Paul and occasionally overturning those staff decisions. This valuable service to the people of Minnesota was eliminated by the legislature in 2015, but it is in the public interest that the citizens board be reinstituted now. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.02, is amended to read: 116.02 POLLUTION CONTROL AGENCY; CREATION AND POWERS. Subdivision 1. Creation. deleted text begin A pollution control agency, designated asdeleted text end The Minnesota Pollution Control Agencydeleted text begin ,deleted text end is deleted text begin herebydeleted text end created.new text begin The agency consists of the commissioner and eight members appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate.new text end new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Terms, compensation, removal, vacancies. new text end new text begin The membership terms, compensation, removal of members, and filling of vacancies on the agency are as provided in section 15.0575. new text end new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The membership of the agency must be broadly representative of the skills and experience necessary to effectuate the policy of sections 116.01 to 116.075, except that no member other than the commissioner may be an officer or employee of the state or federal government. new text end new text begin (b) The membership of the agency must reflect the diversity of the state in terms of race, gender, and geography. new text end new text begin (c) Only two members at one time may be officials or employees of a municipality or any governmental subdivision, but neither may be a member ex officio or otherwise on the management board of a municipal sanitary sewage disposal system. new text end new text begin (d) At least one member must be an enrolled member of a Tribal Nation; at least three members must live in environmental justice communities; at least one member must be a livestock or crop farmer, or both, with fewer than 200 head of livestock or fewer than 500 acres of cropland, or both; and at least one member must be a member of a labor union. new text end new text begin (e) A member must not have a financial interest in any project coming before the agency within two years before or during the member's term. new text end new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Chair. new text end new text begin The commissioner serves as chair of the agency. The agency elects other officers as the agency deems necessary. new text end Subd. 5. Agency successor to commission. The new text begin Minnesota new text end Pollution Control Agency is the successor of the Water Pollution Control Commission, and all powers and duties now vested in or imposed upon said commission by chapter 115, or any act amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, are hereby transferred to, imposed upon, and vested in the deleted text begin commissioner of thedeleted text end new text begin Minnesota new text end Pollution Control Agency. new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Required decisions. new text end new text begin (a) The agency must make final decisions on the following matters: new text end new text begin (1) a petition for preparing an environmental assessment worksheet, if the project proposer or a person commenting on the proposal requests that the decision be made by the agency and the agency requests that it make the decision under subdivision 8a; new text end new text begin (2) the need for an environmental impact statement following preparation of an environmental assessment worksheet under applicable rules, if: new text end new text begin (i) the agency has received a request for an environmental impact statement; new text end new text begin (ii) the project proposer or a person commenting on the proposal requests that the decision be made by the agency and the agency requests that it make the decision under subdivision 8a; or new text end new text begin (iii) the commissioner is recommending preparation of an environmental impact statement; new text end new text begin (3) the scope and adequacy of environmental impact statements; new text end new text begin (4) issuing, reissuing, modifying, or revoking a permit; new text end new text begin (5) final adoption or amendment of agency rules for which a public hearing is required under section 14.25 or for which the commissioner decides to proceed directly to a public hearing under section 14.14, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (6) approving or denying an application for a variance from an agency rule; and new text end new text begin (7) whether to reopen, rescind, or reverse a decision of the agency. new text end new text begin (b) In reviewing projects, the agency must consider whether there has been free prior and informed consent via government-to-government consultation with Tribal Nations and how a project will impact the ability of communities to exercise rights guaranteed by treaties. new text end new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Additional decisions. new text end new text begin The commissioner may request that the agency make additional decisions or provide advice to the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 8a. new text end new text begin Other actions. new text end new text begin (a) Any other action not specifically within the authority of the commissioner must be made by the agency if: new text end new text begin (1) before the commissioner's final decision on an action, one or more members of the agency notify the commissioner of their request that the decision be made by the agency; or new text end new text begin (2) any person submits a petition to the commissioner requesting that the decision be made by the agency and the commissioner grants the petition. new text end new text begin (b) If the commissioner denies a petition submitted under paragraph (a), clause (2), the commissioner must advise the agency and the petitioner of the reasons for the denial. new text end new text begin Subd. 9a. new text end new text begin Providing information. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must inform interested persons as appropriate in public notices and other public documents of their right to request that the agency make decisions in specific matters according to subdivision 6a and the right of agency members to request that decisions be made by the agency according to subdivision 8a. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must regularly inform the agency of activities that have broad policy implications or potential environmental significance and of activities in which the public has exhibited substantial interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Changing decisions. new text end new text begin (a) The agency must not reopen, rescind, or reverse a decision of the agency except upon: new text end new text begin (1) the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the agency; or new text end new text begin (2) a finding that there was an irregularity in a hearing related to the decision, an error of law, or a newly discovered material issue of fact. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements in paragraph (a) are minimum requirements and do not limit the agency's authority under sections 14.06 and 116.07, subdivision 3, to adopt rules: new text end new text begin (1) applying the requirement in paragraph (a), clause (1) or (2), to certain decisions of the agency; or new text end new text begin (2) establishing additional or more stringent requirements for reopening, rescinding, or reversing decisions of the agency. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Office. (a) The Office of Commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency is created and is under the supervision and control of the commissioner, who is appointed by the governor under the provisions of section 15.06. (b) The commissioner may appoint a deputy commissioner and assistant commissioners who deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin arenew text end in the unclassified service. (c) The commissioner shall make all decisions on behalf of the agencynew text begin that are not required to be made by the agency under section 116.02new text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.03, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Mission; efficiency. It is part of the agency's mission thatnew text begin ,new text end within the agency's resourcesnew text begin ,new text end the commissioner new text begin and the members of the agency new text end shall endeavor to: (1) prevent the waste or unnecessary spending of public money; (2) use innovative fiscal and human resource practices to manage the state's resources and operate the agency as efficiently as possible; (3) coordinate the agency's activities wherever appropriate with the activities of other governmental agencies; (4) use technology where appropriate to increase agency productivity, improve customer service, increase public access to information about government, and increase public participation in the business of government; (5) deleted text begin utilizedeleted text end new text begin usenew text end constructive and cooperative labor-management practices to the extent otherwise required by chapters 43A and 179A; (6) report to the legislature on the performance of agency operations and the accomplishment of agency goals in the agency's biennial budget according to section 16A.10, subdivision 1; and (7) recommend to the legislature appropriate changes in law necessary to carry out the mission and improve the performance of the agency.